Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5504
Affordable housing; report; contents.

(1) On or before July 1, 2021, and by each July 1 every two years thereafter, each city shall electronically submit a report to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature detailing its efforts to address the availability of and incentives for affordable housing through its zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations. Such report shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) An overview of the city's current residential zoning requirements;

(b) The percentage of areas within the corporate limits of the city zoned for residential use which permit the construction of multifamily housing and middle housing, including whether such areas are zoned specifically for residential use or generally allow residential use, and whether such construction is permitted with or without any additional permit requirements;

(c) A breakdown of new residential construction within the corporate limits of the city over the previous five years, including the percentage of such construction that was single-family housing, multifamily housing, and middle housing;

(d) A breakdown of residential units annexed by the city over the previous five years, including the percentage of such units that were single-family housing, multifamily housing, and middle housing;

(e) An estimate of the per-unit cost of housing within the corporate limits of the city;

(f) Whether such zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations provide for density bonuses or other concessions or incentives which encourage residential density, and the frequency with which such bonuses, concessions, or incentives are utilized;

(g) Whether such zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations allow the construction of accessory dwelling units;

(h) What incentives the city applies to encourage the development of affordable housing, including both direct incentives and regulatory relief;

(i) The percentage of areas within the corporate limits of the city zoned for residential use which have been declared substandard and blighted areas under the Community Development Law;

(j) The percentage of areas within the corporate limits of the city zoned for residential use which have been declared extremely blighted areas under the Community Development Law;

(k) A demographic analysis of the city with trends and estimates of the housing need classified by housing type and price range; and

(l) Efforts to adopt an affordable housing action plan as required under section 19-5505 or efforts to implement an affordable housing action plan after such plan is adopted.

(2) The Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature may require any city to present its report to the committee at a public hearing.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 331;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 22.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.